Nebraska, session 109, LB190.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB190 LB190
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 50-1208, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
50-1208 (1) The committee shall review and approve a schedule of
audits of all state agencies on a rotating basis so that each agency, or
portion of an agency, is audited every five years.
(2) (1) The committee shall, by majority vote, adopt additional
specific requests for performance audit. The committee chairperson shall
notify each requester of any action taken on his or her request.
(3) (2) Before the office begins a performance audit, it shall
notify in writing the agency director, the program director, when
relevant, and the Governor that a performance audit will be conducted.
(4) (3) Following notification, the office shall arrange an entrance
conference to provide the agency with further information about the audit
process. The agency director shall inform the agency staff, in writing,
of the performance audit and shall instruct agency staff to cooperate
fully with the office.
(5) (4) After the entrance conference, the office shall conduct the
research necessary to draft a scope statement for consideration by the
committee. The scope statement shall identify the specific issues to be
addressed in the audit. The committee shall, by majority vote, adopt,
reject, or amend and adopt the scope statement prepared by the office.
(6) (5) Once the committee has adopted a scope statement, the office
shall develop an audit plan. The audit plan shall include a description
of the research and audit methodologies to be employed and a projected
deadline for completion of the office's report. The audit plan shall be
submitted to the committee, and a majority vote shall be required for its
approval. Upon approval of the audit plan, the agency shall be notified
in writing of the specific scope of the audit and the projected deadline
for completion of the office's report. If the office needs information
from a political subdivision or entity thereof to effectively conduct a
performance audit of an agency, the political subdivision or entity
-2-

LB190 LB190
2025 2025
thereof shall provide information, on request, to the office.
(7) (6) If the performance audit reveals a need to modify the scope
statement or audit plan, the Legislative Auditor may request that the
committee make revisions. A majority vote shall be required to revise the
scope statement or audit plan. The agency shall be notified in writing of
any revision to the scope statement or audit plan.
Sec. 2. Original section 50-1208, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-